District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

26-601

Definitions.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 20, 1998, D.C. Law 12-60, § 1802, 44 DCR 7378
Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-175, § 1902(a), 45 DCR 7193

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 26-802.2.

Temporary Addition of Section

D.C. Law 12-59, title XVIII, § 1802 ( 44 DCR 7356), eff. March 20, 1998, provided for the temporary addition of this section.
Section 2001(b) of D.C. Law 12-59 provided for expiration “after 225 days of its having taken effect.”
Section 2002 of D.C. Law 12-59 provided: “Sec. 2002. This act shall apply as of October 1, 1997.”

Emergency Legislation

For temporary repeal of section, see § 1502(a) of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-401, July 13, 1998, 45 DCR 4794) and § 1502(a) of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-564, January 12, 1999, 46 DCR 669).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 1502(a) of the Fiscal Year 1999 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-41, March 31, 1999, 46 DCR 3446).

Editor's Notes

D.C. Law 12-60, title XVIII, § 1802 ( 44 DCR 7378), eff. March 20, 1998, added this section. Section 2002 of D.C. Law 12-60 provided: “Sec. 2002. This act shall apply as of October 1, 1997.”

Application of D.C. Law 12-175: Section 1904 of D.C. Law 12-175 provided that the act shall apply as of October 1, 1998.